incubator/apertium-ces-ces/apertium-ces-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="Bílsk/o-Bělá__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o-Bělá</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a-Bělé</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u-Bělé</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o-Bělo</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěm-Bělou</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u-Bělé</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o-Bělá</l>
        <r>o-Bělá<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Jizersk/é_hory__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hory</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ých<b/>hor</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ým<b/>horám</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hory</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hory</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ých<b/>horách</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ými<b/>horami</l>
        <r>é<b/>hory<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Odersk/é_vrchy__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchy</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ých<b/>vrchů</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ým<b/>vrchům</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchy</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchy</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ých<b/>vrších</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ými<b/>vrchy</l>
        <r>é<b/>vrchy<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Hostýnsko-vsetínsk/á_hornatina__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>hornatina</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hornatiny</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hornatině</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>hornatinu</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>hornatino</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>hornatině</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>hornatinou</l>
        <r>á<b/>hornatina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Vizovick/á_vrchovina__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>vrchovina</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchoviny</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchovině</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>vrchovinu</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>vrchovino</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>vrchovině</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>vrchovinou</l>
        <r>á<b/>vrchovina<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Česk/á_republika__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>republika</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republiky</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republice</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>republiku</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>republiko</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republice</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>republikou</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Spojen/é_království__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ého<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ému<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ým<b/>královstvím</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="Bílsko-Bělá"><i>Bílsk</i><par n="Bílsk/o-Bělá__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hostýnsko-vsetínská hornatina"><i>Hostýnsko-vsetínsk</i><par n="Hostýnsko-vsetínsk/á_hornatina__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irská republika"><i>Irsk</i><par n="Česk/á_republika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jizerské hory"><i>Jizersk</i><par n="Jizersk/é_hory__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lužické hory"><i>Lužick</i><par n="Jizersk/é_hory__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Oderské vrchy"><i>Odersk</i><par n="Odersk/é_vrchy__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Orlické hory"><i>Orlick</i><par n="Jizersk/é_hory__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Rychlebské hory"><i>Rychlebsk</i><par n="Jizersk/é_hory__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spojené království"><i>Spojen</i><par n="Spojen/é_království__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spojené království Velké Británie a Severního Irska"><i>Spojen</i><par n="Spojen/é_království__np"/><p><l><b/>Velké<b/>Británie<b/>a<b/>Severního<b/>Irska</l><r><g><b/>Velké<b/>Británie<b/>a<b/>Severního<b/>Irska</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Stolové hory"><i>Stolov</i><par n="Jizersk/é_hory__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vizovická vrchovina"><i>Vizovick</i><par n="Vizovick/á_vrchovina__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Vsetínské vrchy"><i>Vsetínsk</i><par n="Odersk/é_vrchy__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Česká republika"><i>Česk</i><par n="Česk/á_republika__np"/></e>
